Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1240
Bridges; obstructions to construction; removal; damages; payment.

All individuals or corporations having buildings, structures, works, conduits, mains, sewers, wires, tracks, or other obstructions in, over, upon, or adjacent to the public streets, lanes, alleys, or highways or in, under, over or adjacent to the river over which the bridges are to be constructed, and which shall interfere with or impede the progress of the bridges and approaches when in process of construction and establishment, shall upon reasonable notice from the commission temporarily so shift, adjust, accommodate, or remove the same, as fully to meet the exigencies occasioning such action. Upon completion of such construction, the actual cost thereof, if reasonable, otherwise the reasonable cost thereof, and other incidental damages, shall be promptly paid to such person by the commission. In case of disagreement as to reasonable cost, the damages sustained shall be ascertained and determined as provided in sections 76-704 to 76-724 and shall be paid at once by the commission out of funds provided for in sections 14-1201 to 14-1252. Similar powers may be exercised in an adjoining state if and in the manner authorized by an act of Congress or the law of that state.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 18, p. 627;

C.S.1929, § 14-1218;

R.S.1943, § 14-1240;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 42, p. 465.